Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.070

Bonds—Use of proceeds.

(1) The proceeds of any bond issued pursuant to RCW 36.83.040 or 36.83.050 may be used to pay costs incurred on such bond issue related to the sale and issuance of the bonds. Such costs include payments for fiscal and legal expenses, obtaining bond ratings, printing, engraving, advertising, and other similar activities.

(2) In addition, proceeds of bonds used to fund capital projects may be used to pay the necessary and related engineering, architectural, planning, and inspection costs.

[ 1983 c 130 s 7.]